Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 18 Sale and Redemption of Realty Sold Under Mortgage or Execution
§ 1-18-112.
Sale on foreclosure of mortgage; property in more than single county.

When the mortgaged property
is situated in more than one (1) county, the court may order the sheriff
or other officer of each to make the sale of the property in his county,
or may direct one (1) officer to sell the whole. The court shall direct
whether publication of the sale shall be made in all the counties
or in one (1) county only.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 324; R.S. 1887, § 2664; R.S. 1899, § 3758; C.S. 1910, § 4613; C.S. 1920, § 5884; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 92; R.S. 1931, § 89-2210; C.S. 1945, § 3-3508; W.S. 1957, § 1-489; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-19-112.

Foreclosure as single unit. —

Directing foreclosure sale as single unit of noncontiguous properties in two counties, where mortgages were of same date securing same indebtedness, was not “irregularity in obtaining judgment” for which judgment might be vacated after term. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 1-18-113.
Payment
of proceeds.

After any sale of real
estate as provided in this chapter, proceeds from the sale shall be
paid over by the officer or other person making the sale in accordance
with W.S.

34-4-113

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 1.

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 3, makes the act applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after July 1, 2005.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 1-18-114.
Omitted
parties; definitions.

For purposes of this section:

“Omitted party” means any person who:

Subsequent to the recording of a mortgage, deed of trust or other lien instrument pursuant to which a foreclosure sale has been conducted, has either acquired a record interest in the property subject to a mortgage foreclosure, deed of trust or execution sale, or has obtained a valid possessory interest and is in actual possession of the property; and

Is not included as a party defendant in a judicial foreclosure action or, if included, is entitled to notice, but was not served with process, or was not mailed notice of the execution sale or is not notified pursuant to W.S.

34-4-104

of a mortgage foreclosure sale.

“Interested person” means any holder of a certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption issued pursuant to W.S.

1-18-102

and

1-18-106

or any owner of the property by virtue of a sheriff’s or public trustee’s deed or person claiming through such owner.

The interest of an omitted party in the property which is the subject of a mortgage foreclosure, execution or sheriff’s or trustee’s sale may be terminated in a civil action commenced by any interested person if the omitted party is afforded rights of redemption upon terms as the district court for the district in which the property is located may deem just under the circumstances, which terms shall not, however, be more favorable than the person’s statutory rights had the person been provided notice of the sale.

For purposes of this section, the mortgage, judgment or other lien which is the subject of the sale shall not be extinguished by merger with the title to the property acquired upon issuance and delivery of the sheriff’s deed until the interest of any omitted party has been terminated as provided in subsection (b) of this section or by operation of law.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 1.

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 3, makes the act applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after July 1, 2005.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 1-18-115.
Rescission
of foreclosure sale.

A judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure sale may be rescinded in accordance with this section at any time after the sale but before the sheriff’s deed has been recorded.

If the purchaser at the foreclosure sale was the foreclosing mortgagee, then the foreclosing mortgagee may rescind the sale for any reason by executing and recording a notice of foreclosure sale rescission in the office of the county clerk of the county where the real estate is located.

If the purchaser at the foreclosure sale was not the foreclosing mortgagee, then the foreclosing mortgagee and the certificate holder may agree to rescind the foreclosure sale for any reason. In order to rescind such a foreclosure sale, the foreclosing mortgagee shall refund to the certificate holder either an amount agreed upon by the foreclosing mortgagee and the certificate holder, or the foreclosure sale bid amount plus ten percent (10%) interest per annum, calculated daily. In addition, both the foreclosing mortgagee and the certificate holder shall execute a notice of foreclosure sale rescission which shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county where the real estate is located.

If the purchaser at the foreclosure sale was not the foreclosing mortgagee, and the certificate holder will not agree to rescind the foreclosure sale, then the foreclosing mortgagee may still rescind the sale if the statutory requirements for the foreclosure sale were not fulfilled or if the foreclosure sale did not comply with applicable federal or state law. In order to rescind such a foreclosure sale, the foreclosing mortgagee shall refund to the certificate holder the purchase price, plus ten percent (10%) interest per annum, calculated daily, and the foreclosing mortgagee shall execute and record a notice of foreclosure sale rescission in the office of the county clerk of the county where the real estate is located which shall recite that the foreclosure sale is being rescinded pursuant to this subsection. The refund of the certificate holder’s bid amount, plus interest, shall be the certificate holder’s only remedy notwithstanding any other provision of law.

Upon recording a notice of foreclosure sale rescission:

The mortgage and power of sale which are the subject of the rescinded sale are revived and the mortgage may be properly foreclosed in a subsequent foreclosure sale in compliance with applicable law, and all junior liens and rights of junior lienholders are revived with the same lien priority as if no foreclosure sale had taken place;

The certificate of sale is rendered null and void as if no foreclosure sale had taken place; and

The mortgagor’s indebtedness to the foreclosing mortgagee and all evidence thereof are revived as of the date of the foreclosure sale and as if no certificate of sale had been issued, or as otherwise agreed to by the mortgagor and mortgagee.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 173, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 173, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.